Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5481.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 509. (1) The commission may issue, without regard to the quota provisions requirements of section 531, licenses to a commission, board, or authority governing or operating a municipal civic center or civic auditorium or to 1 or more of its concessionaires, or to both, if all of the following apply: (a) The center or auditorium is within a city or township having a population of not less than 5,500.5,000. (b) The center or auditorium is owned and operated as a municipal enterprise. (c) The legislative body of the municipality first authorizes the operating authority of the civic center or civic auditorium or its concessionaire to apply to the commission for a license. (2) Licenses issued under this section are not transferable, must not be issued to an educational institution or for a facility operated in connection with an educational institution, and must authorize the sale of alcoholic liquor only in connection with a scheduled event at the licensed premises.